Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 2. Care of Children.

Administrative Code. —

For social services, see 7 AAC 53.

Sec. 47.14.100.
Powers and duties of department over care of child.

Subject to (e), (f), and (i) — (m) of this section, the department shall arrange for the care of every child committed to its custody by placing the child in a foster home or in the care of an agency or institution providing care for children inside or outside the state. The department may place a child in a suitable family home, with or without compensation, and may place a child released to it, in writing verified by the parent, or guardian or other person having legal custody, for adoptive purposes, in a home for adoption in accordance with existing law. For a child 16 years of age or older, the department may authorize another transitional living arrangement, including student dormitory residence at a postsecondary educational institution, that adequately meets the child’s needs and is designed to assist the child’s transition to independent living.

The department may pay the costs of maintenance that are necessary to assure adequate care of the child, and may accept funds from the federal government that are granted to assist in carrying out the purposes of this chapter, or that are paid under contract entered into with a federal department or agency. A child under the care of the department may not be placed in a family home or institution that does not maintain adequate standards of care.

The department may receive, care for, and make appropriate placement of minors accepted for care for a period of up to six months on the basis of an individual voluntary written agreement between the minor’s parent, legal guardian, or other person having legal custody and the department. The agreement must include provisions for payment of fees under AS

44.29.022

to the department for the minor’s care and treatment. The agreement entered into may not prohibit a minor’s parent, legal guardian, or other person who had legal custody from regaining care of the minor at any time.

In addition to money paid for the maintenance of foster children under (b) of this section, the department

shall pay the costs of caring for foster children with physical or mental disabilities, including the additional costs of medical care, habilitative and rehabilitative treatment, services and equipment, and special clothing, and the indirect costs of medical care, including child care and transportation expenses;

may pay for respite care; in this paragraph, “respite care” means child care for the purpose of providing temporary relief from the stresses of caring for a foster child; and

may pay a subsidized guardianship payment under AS

25.23.210

when a foster child’s foster parents or other persons approved by the department become court-appointed legal guardians of the child.

When a child is removed from a parent’s home, the department shall search for an appropriate placement with an adult family member or family friend. A supervisor at the department shall certify in writing in the case file whether the department has searched for an appropriate placement with an adult family member or family friend. If the department has not complied with the search requirements under this subsection, the supervisor shall work to ensure that the department completes the search in the shortest time feasible. The department shall place the child, in the absence of clear and convincing evidence of good cause to the contrary,

in the least restrictive setting that most closely approximates a family and that meets the child’s special needs, if any;

within reasonable proximity to the child’s home, taking into account any special needs of the child and the preferences of the child or parent;

with, in the following order of preference,

an adult family member;

a family friend who meets the foster care licensing requirements established by the department;

a licensed foster home that is not an adult family member or family friend;

an institution for children that has a program suitable to meet the child’s needs.

If an adult family member of the child specified under (e) of this section exists and agrees that the child should be placed elsewhere, before placement elsewhere, the department shall fully communicate the nature of the placement proceedings to the adult family member. Communication under this subsection shall be made in the adult family member’s native language, if necessary.

The department may enter into agreements with Alaska Native villages or Native organizations under 25 U.S.C. 1919 (Indian Child Welfare Act of 1978) respecting the care and custody of Native children and jurisdiction of Native child custody proceedings.

The department may not pay for respite care, as defined in (d) of this section, unless the department or the entity that has contracted with the department to provide the respite care requests criminal history record information as permitted by P.L. 105-277 and AS 12.62 for the individual who provides the respite care within 10 business days after the individual is hired to provide respite care and reviews the information within five business days after receiving it.

A child may not be placed with an out-of-home care provider if the department determines that the child can remain safely at home with an adult family member or guardian who lives with the child. In this subsection, “out-of-home care provider” means an agency or person, other than the child’s legal parents, with whom a child who is in the custody of the state under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

or (3),

47.10.142

, or (c) of this section is currently placed; “agency or person” includes a foster parent, a relative other than a parent, a person who has petitioned for adoption of the child, and a residential child care facility.

For the purpose of determining whether the home of a relative meets the requirements for placement of a child under (e) of this section or under AS

47.10.088(i)

, the department shall conduct a criminal background check from state and national criminal justice information available under AS 12.62. The department may conduct a fingerprint background check on any member of the relative’s household who is 16 years of age or older when the relative requests placement of the child. For the purposes of obtaining criminal justice information under this subsection, the department is a criminal justice agency conducting a criminal justice activity under AS 12.62.

Notwithstanding other provisions of this section, the department may not pay for inpatient psychiatric services provided to a person under 21 years of age and who is in the custody of the department if the services are provided in an out-of-state psychiatric hospital facility or an out-of-state residential psychiatric treatment center unless the department determines that the assistance is for

psychiatric hospital services that are consistent with the person’s clinical diagnosis and appropriately address the person’s needs and that these services are unavailable in the state; or

residential psychiatric treatment center services that are consistent with the person’s clinical diagnosis and appropriately address the person’s needs and that these services are unavailable in the state.

The department shall, on a monthly basis, evaluate what types of services are available in the state for inpatient psychiatric care for persons under 21 years of age. If inpatient psychiatric services that are consistent with the person’s clinical diagnosis and that appropriately address the person’s needs become available at a location in the state for a person under 21 years of age who is receiving the services under this section at a location outside the state, the department shall, as a condition of continued payment by the state for the services, require the person to be transferred to the in-state facility unless the department determines that the transfer would be detrimental to the person’s health, established therapeutic relationship, or clinical need.

Prima facie evidence of good cause not to place a child with an adult family member or family friend under AS

47.10.088(i)

or under (e) of this section includes the failure to meet the requirements for a foster care license under AS 47.32 and regulations adopted under AS 47.32, taking into account a waiver, variance, or exemption allowed under AS

47.32.030(a)(3)

and

47.32.032

. Prima facie evidence of good cause not to place a child with an adult family member or adult family friend does not include poverty or inadequate or crowded housing. If the department denies a request for placement with an adult family member or a family friend, the department shall inform the adult family member or family friend of the basis for the denial and the right to request a hearing to review the decision. A non-party adult family member or family friend requesting a review hearing under AS

47.10.088(i)

or under (e) of this section is not eligible for publicly appointed legal counsel.

Except as provided in (o) and (p) of this section, the department shall continue to search for a suitable adoptive or permanent legal guardianship for a child or person who is in the custody of the state and who is under 21 years of age.

The department may recommend to the court another planned permanent living arrangement for a child who is in state custody only if

the child is 16 years of age or older;

the department has unsuccessfully made intensive efforts to find a permanent placement for the child; and

the department, after considering reunification, adoption, legal guardianship, or permanent placement with a fit and willing relative, determines that there is a compelling reason that the most appropriate permanency plan for the child is placement in another planned permanent living arrangement, and the department documents for the court the compelling reason for the alternate plan.

The department may release from state custody a child or person who has been committed to the custody of the department, before the custody is ordered to end, only if the person, if the person is 19 years of age or older, consents, or

the child or person, if the child or person is over 16 years of age and available, and the guardian ad litem are notified not less than 30 days before a motion for release is filed unless the parties agree to a shorter notice period;

the department files a motion with the court for release of state custody that describes the reasons the release is in the best interest of the child or person; and

a court makes a written finding that release from state custody is in the best interest of the child or person.

When custody of a child who has been committed to the custody of the department is due to expire, the department shall file a notice of release with the court 30 days before the date of release unless the parties agree to a shorter notice period and distribute the notice to the parties, including the child if the child is 16 years of age or older and available.

The department shall make reasonable efforts to place siblings in the same placement if the siblings are residing in the same home when taken into the custody of the department. If siblings are not placed together after reasonable efforts have been made, the case supervisor for the division with responsibility over the custody of children shall document in the file the efforts that were made and the reason separating the siblings for placement purposes is in the best interest of the children. If it is in the best interests of the children to maintain contact, the department shall provide each sibling with contact information for the other sibling and encourage the children’s caregivers to provide opportunities for contact between the siblings. In this subsection, “sibling” means two or more persons who are related by blood, adoption, or marriage as a child of one or both parents.

As used in (o) of this section, “compelling reason” may include circumstances in which

the child has specifically requested that emancipation be established;

a parent and child have a significant bond, but the parent is unable to care for the child because of an emotional or physical disability, and the child’s foster parents have committed to raising the child to the age of majority and to facilitating visitation with the disabled parent.

In this section,

“adult family member” has the meaning given in AS

47.10.990

;

“another planned permanent living arrangement” means a permanent living arrangement for a child who is committed to the custody of the department under AS

47.10.080(c)(1)

that is an alternative to permanent placement with an adult family member, and to reunification, adoption, and legal guardianship.

“family friend,” as used in (e) of this section, includes, in the case of an Indian child, a member of the Indian child’s tribe, a member of the tribe in which the child’s biological parent is a member, and another Indian family member.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996; am §§ 47 — 50 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 71 ch 35 SLA 2003; am §§ 2, 3 ch 137 SLA 2003; am § 2 ch 23 SLA 2004; am §§ 33 — 37 ch 64 SLA 2005; am § 8 ch 20 SLA 2006; am § 22 ch 25 SLA 2006; am § 53 ch 40 SLA 2008; am § 72 ch 41 SLA 2009; am §§ 6, 7 ch 59 SLA 2012; am § 13 ch 6 4SSLA 2016; am §§
9 — 11 ch 7 4SSLA 2016; am §§ 14 — 16 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Revisor's notes. —

In 2012, subsections (n) — (s) were enacted as (o) — (t) and relettered, former subsection (n) was relettered as (t), and the definition of “adult family member” designated as (t)(1). The definition of “another planned permanent living arrangement” was enacted as (u) and redesignated as (t)(2). Internal references in subsections (n) and (s) were conformed.

Cross references. —

P.L. 105-277, division A, Sec. 101(b) (title I, Sec. 124(a)), 112 Stat. 2681-50, 2681-73, provided that: “A nursing facility or home health care agency may submit a request to the Attorney General to conduct a search and exchange of [criminal history records corresponding to the fingerprints or other identification information submitted] regarding an applicant for employment if the employment position is involved in direct patient care.”

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 22(a), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

For applicability, see 7 AAC 52, art. 1.

For admission to juvenile correctional facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 2.

For operations, see 7 AAC 52, art. 3.

For program and treatment, see 7 AAC 52, art. 4.

For communications and visiting, see 7 AAC 52, art. 5.

For discipline, see 7 AAC 52, art. 6.

For supervision, see 7 AAC 52, art. 7.

For juvenile detention facilities, see 7 AAC 52, art. 8.

For child foster care payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 1.

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

For children in custody or under supervision: needs and income, see 7 AAC 53, art. 3.

For foster and residential care placement and foster home evaluation, see 7 AAC 56, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The first 2003 amendment, effective June 3, 2003, in subsection (i) deleted “, as that term is defined in AS

47.14.299

,” following the first instance of “out-of-home care provider” near the beginning and added the definitions of “out-of-home care provider” and “agency or person.”

The second 2003 amendment, effective October 8, 2003, updated subsection references in subsection (a) and added subsections (k) and (

l

).

The 2004 amendment, effective April 24, 2004, in subsection (h), substituted “criminal history record information as permitted by P.L. 105-277 and AS 12.62” for “records under AS 12.62.035(a) are” and made related changes.

The 2005 amendment, effective July 1, 2005, updated subsection references in subsection (a); rewrote subsection (e); in subsection (f) substituted reference to “family members” for reference to “relatives” and deleted the last sentence; in subsection (j) inserted “under (e) of this section or under AS

47.10.088(i)

” in the first sentence and substituted “16 years of age” for “12 years of age” in the second sentence; and added subsection (m).

The first 2006 amendment, effective May 4, 2006, substituted “clear and convincing evidence” for “a showing” in the introductory language of subsection (e).

The second 2006 amendment, effective May 10, 2006, substituted “foster children with physical or mental disabilities” for “physically or mentally handicapped foster children” in paragraph (d)(1), and inserted “and” preceding “special clothing” in that paragraph.

The 2008 amendment, effective May 23, 2008, substituted “the failure to meet the requirements for a foster care license under AS 47.32 and regulations adopted under AS 47.32” for “grounds for denial of a foster care license under AS 47.35.019 or 47.35.021” in the first sentence of subsection (m).

The 2009 amendment, effective June 21, 2009, added (n) [now (t)(1)].

The 2012 amendment, effective September 9, 2012, in (m), inserted “, taking into account a waiver, variance, or exemption allowed under AS

47.32.030(a)(3)

and

47.32.032

” following “regulations adopted under AS 47.32”; added (o) through (u) (now (n) through (s) and (t)(2)).

The first 2016 amendment, effective January 1, 2017, added (t)(3).

The second 2016 amendment, effective October 24, 2016, added the last sentence of (a); in (n), inserted “or person” following “permanent legal guardianship for a child” and substituted “21 years of age” for “18 years of age”; in (p), inserted “or person” following “a child” four times, and added “the person, if the person is 19 years of age or older, consents, or” at the end of the introductory language.

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, in the introductory language in (e), inserted “search for an appropriate placement with an adult family member or family friend. A supervisor at the department shall certify in writing in the case file whether the department has searched for an appropriate placement with an adult family member or family friend. If the department has not complied with the search requirements under this subsection, the supervisor shall work to ensure that the department completes the search in the shortest time feasible. The department shall” following the first occurrence of “the department shall”; in the first sentence in (i), substituted “an adult family member or guardian who lives with the child” for “one parent or guardian” following “remain safely at home with”; in (r), added the third sentence.

Sec. 47.14.110.
Department inspections; reports by foster homes and institutions.

A representative of the department shall visit, as often as is considered necessary, every foster home or institution in which a child is placed, and, if not satisfied as to the care given, may remove the child from the foster home or institution and place the child elsewhere.

The person or institution receiving a child shall submit the reports the department requires as to the education, health, and welfare of the child and the conditions under which the child is living.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Sec. 47.14.112.
Training and workload standards; reports to legislature.

The department shall implement workload standards and a training program for employees who supervise the care of children committed to the supervision or custody of the department under AS 47.10, work with families to prevent the removal of a child from the child’s home under AS 47.10, or investigate reports of harm under AS 47.17. The department shall prepare a staffing report under (b) of this section if the department is unable

to employ the number of qualified employees necessary to ensure that

the department reasonably and safely minimizes the time a child is not in a permanent living arrangement or under a permanent guardianship;

a child is not removed from the child’s home when it is possible and in the child’s best interest for the department to work with the child’s family to prevent the removal of the child from the child’s home;

each child is placed in a permanent home not more than 24 months after the date the child is first removed from the child’s home;

to meet best practices standards set by the department requiring the employment of mentors for employees who supervise the care of children committed to the supervision or custody of the department under AS 47.10, work with families to prevent the removal of a child from the child’s home under AS 47.10, or investigate reports of harm under AS 47.17;

for a new employee who supervises the care of a child committed to the supervision or custody of the department under AS 47.10, works with families to prevent the removal of a child from the child’s home under AS 47.10, or investigates reports of harm under AS 47.17, to

provide a minimum of six weeks of training unless the department finds that the new employee has sufficient experience to justify a shorter training period;

limit the employee’s workload as follows:

before the beginning of an employee’s fourth month of work with the department, the employee may supervise not more than six families;

after the beginning of the employee’s fourth month of work but before the end of the employee’s sixth month of work with the department, the employee may supervise not more than 12 families;

when an employee supervises families in a region where travel distances negatively affect the employee’s ability to supervise families and the employee has worked for the department for less than 12 months, the employee may not supervise the maximum number of families provided under (i) and (ii) of this subparagraph; and

for an employee, other than a new employee, who supervises the care of children committed to the supervision or custody of the department under AS 47.10, works with families to prevent the removal of a child from the child’s home under AS 47.10, or investigates reports of harm under AS 47.17, to ensure that the average statewide caseload is not more than 13 families for each worker.

A staffing report prepared as a result of the department’s inability to meet the training and workload standards in (a) of this section must be included in the department’s annual report to the legislature required under AS

18.05.020

. The department shall explain in the staffing report the reasons the department has not been able to meet the standards and provide the following information:

the number of employees who vacated positions during the reporting period;

the number of funded positions that are vacant;

a description of efforts made to recruit and retain employees;

if the department determines additional employee positions are necessary to meet the standards, the number and cost of the additional positions;

if the department determines additional funding is necessary to meet the standards, the amount and purpose of the additional funding; and

the effects on a child and the child’s family of the department’s inability to meet the standards.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, the department is immune from suit under this section if the department was unable to meet the workload standards and adjusted workload standards because of a lack of sufficient appropriations or because the department’s efforts to recruit or retain employees did not result in an adequate number of qualified applicants to meet the workload standards, as outlined in the staffing report.

The division of the department with responsibility over the custody of children shall prepare and make available to the legislature an annual report on employee recruitment and retention, including a five-year plan, for the division. Not later than November 15 of each year, the department shall deliver the report to the senate secretary and the chief clerk of the house of representatives and notify the legislature that the report is available. The report prepared under this subsection is separate from the annual report to the legislature required under AS

18.05.020

and must include, for the previous 12 months,

the number of frontline social workers employed by the division, the annual average turnover rate of the workers, and the average caseload of the workers on January 1 and July 1 of that year;

the number of children removed from their homes;

the achievement of success measured by the following:

rate of family reunification;

average length of time children spent in custody of the department;

rate of placement with an adult family member or family friend;

number of children placed in a permanent living arrangement with a guardian or biological or adoptive parent;

number of children released from the custody of the department;

if the department has met or exceeded the caseload standards under this chapter and, if the standards were exceeded, the number of caseworker positions in the division that could be eliminated and the amount of funding that could be reduced while continuing to meet but not routinely exceed the caseload standards;

the performance of the department on federal benchmarks focused on the safety, well-being, and permanent placements of foster children compared with the previous five years.

History.

(§ 17 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 17,
ch. 15, SLA 2018, which enacted this section, took effect on September 5, 2018.

Sec. 47.14.115.
Training of foster parents.

If the department has placed a child in a foster home, the department shall, no less often than once quarterly, make available training that will assist the foster parent or parents in providing care that will meet the needs of the child placed in the home and the requirements established by the department in regulation.

If the department determines that it is in the best interests of a child in the custody of the department to place the child with an adult family member who does not have a foster care home license under AS 47.32, the department shall assist the adult family member in obtaining a license, including assisting the adult family member with obtaining any variances necessary to obtain the license, so that the family member is eligible for payments under AS

47.14.100(b)

and (d).

History.

(§ 51 ch 99 SLA 1998; am § 18 ch 15 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For provision relating to applicability of the 2018 amendment to this section, see sec. 22(a), ch. 15, SLA 2018, in the 2018 Temporary and Special Acts.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective September 5, 2018, added (b).

Sec. 47.14.120.
Standards of care.

The department shall establish standards of care and adopt regulations desirable for the welfare of every child under its care.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996)

Administrative Code. —

For purpose, applicability, and administrative provisions, see 7 AAC 10, art. 1.

For environmental health and safety, see 7 AAC 10, art. 4.

For inspections and investigations, see 7 AAC 10, art. 6.

For residential psychiatric treatment centers, see 7 AAC 50, art. 9.

For subsidized adoption and subsidized guardianship payments, see 7 AAC 53, art. 2.

For foster and residential care placement and foster home evaluation, see 7 AAC 56, art. 6.

Sec. 47.14.130.
Payment of costs.

The department shall pay the proper and necessary costs of the court and witnesses and other expenses necessarily incurred in the enforcement of AS

47.14.100

—

47.14.130

.

History.

(§ 47 ch 59 SLA 1996)